District of Columbia statutes.
29-705.01

Form of contribution.

A contribution of a partner may consist of property transferred, services performed, or another benefit provided to the partnership or an agreement to transfer property, perform services, or provide another benefit to the partnership.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(6)(A), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “property transferred, services performed, or another benefit provided to the partnership or an agreement to transfer property, perform services, or provide another benefit to the partnership” for “tangible or intangible property or other benefit to the limited partnership, including money, services performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute cash or property, and contracts for services to be performed.”

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 501 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.